apertium-rup.rup.dix
    <pardef n="discl/oțu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>oțu</l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>uțamu</l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>uțamu</l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>uțai</l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>uțatâ</l><r>oțu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="c/ocu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>ocu</l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>uaptâ</l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>uaptâ</l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>uțeamu</l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>uațiri</l><r>ocu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nc/ohiu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>ohiu</l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>uhiamu</l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>uhiamu</l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>uhiai</l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>uhiatâ</l><r>ohiu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="c/osu__vblex">
	    <e><p><l>osu</l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>useamu</l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>useamu</l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

	    <e><p><l>usui</l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l></l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	
	    <e><p><l>uasiri</l><r>osu<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="discl"><i>oțu</i><par n="discl/oțu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="c"><i>ocu</i><par n="c/ocu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="parac"><i>ocu</i><par n="c/ocu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="nc"><i>ohiu</i><par n="nc/ohiu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="disc"><i>ohiu</i><par n="nc/ohiu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="c"><i>osu</i><par n="c/osu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="disc"><i>osu</i><par n="c/osu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="dizv"><i>ocu</i><par n="c/ocu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="gi"><i>ocu</i><par n="c/ocu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="t"><i>ocu</i><par n="c/ocu__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="t"><i>ocu</i><par n="c/ocu__vblex"/></e>
